Utah statutes.
58-5a-302.   Qualifications to practice podiatry.
An applicant for licensure to practice podiatry shall:
(1)  submit an application in a form as prescribed by the division;
(2)  pay a fee as determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(3)  be of good moral character;
(4)  be a graduate of a college of podiatric medicine accredited by the
Council of Podiatric Education;
(5)  have completed one year of postgraduate training in a residency program
recognized by the board; and
(6)  pass examinations required by rule.
